Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-104
Gasoline and other explosives; purchase; containers or portable tanks; type required.

Every person within this state purchasing gasoline or other high explosives of that nature for his or her own use shall procure and keep the same only in containers or portable tanks painted and stamped as required by section 66-103. This section and section 66-103 shall not affect sales, purchase, or the keeping for use of such explosives if the quantity is one quart or less.

Laws 1907, c. 86, § 3, p. 305;

R.S.1913, § 5756;

C.S.1922, § 5101;

C.S.1929, § 66-105;

R.S.1943, § 66-104;

Laws 1985, LB 441, § 3.